New York, session 2025-2026, S9184.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Security officers employed by St. Joseph's Health Hospital, 4 located at 301 Prospect Avenue in the city of Syracuse; North Medical 5 Center, located at Taft Road in the village of North Syracuse; and 6 Northeast Medical Center, located at Northeast Medical Center Drive, 7 Suite 301 in the village of Fayetteville, when acting pursuant to their 8 special duties on the grounds or premises owned, controlled or adminis- 9 tered by such hospital or any of its subsidiaries, shall have the powers 10 of peace officers within such geographic area and beyond such area upon 11 the request of the chief law enforcement officer of the local law 12 enforcement jurisdiction or such officer's designee for the purpose of 13 transporting an individual who has been arrested in accordance with 14 section 140.27 of this chapter when no local law enforcement officer is 15 available to transport such individual in a timely manner. Such peace 16 officers shall have the powers set forth in paragraphs (a), (b), (c), 17 (d), (e) and (h) of subdivision one of section 2.20 of this article and 18 the power to detain an individual for a reasonable period of time while 19 awaiting the arrival of law enforcement, provided that such peace offi- 20 cer has actual knowledge, or probable cause to believe, that such indi- 21 vidual has committed an offense; provided, however, that nothing in this 22 subdivision shall be deemed to authorize such officer to carry, possess, 23 repair or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor 24 has been issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14832-02-6